Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 3161.
Regulation of private investigative and security services; Director; advisor appointees.

The Director shall administer the provisions of this chapter.
(a) (1) The Director shall administer the provisions of this chapter.

The Director shall consult the advisor appointees prior to exercising interpretive discretion, adopting or amending rules, and determining any substantial regulatory question presented in the course of administering this chapter.

The Secretary of State shall appoint five persons of suitable qualifications in accordance with this section to advise the Director in matters concerning private investigative and security services.
(b) (1) The Secretary of State shall appoint five persons of suitable qualifications in accordance with this section to advise the Director in matters concerning private investigative and security services.

Two advisors shall be members of the public with no financial interest, either personally or through a spouse, in private investigative services or security services.

One advisor shall be a provider of private investigative services.

One advisor shall be a provider of private security services.

The remaining member shall be a provider of private investigative services or a provider of private security services, or a provider of both types of services.

The Secretary of State shall appoint the advisors for five-year staggered terms. Four of the initial appointments shall be for four-, three-, two-, and one-year terms.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 98

, § 1; amended

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 27

, § 89;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3162.
Director; powers and duties.

The Director shall adopt rules necessary for the effective administration of this chapter, including rules prescribing minimum standards and qualifications for:

security guards who may:

practice independently or head agencies; or

practice within the hierarchy of an agency;

private investigators who may:

practice independently or head agencies; or

practice within the hierarchy of an agency;

agencies; and

recognized trainers and training programs.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 98

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 89a;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3163.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§§ 3164,
3165.
Repealed. 1995, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 18.